Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1451
Purposes; construction.

(1) The Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(2) The underlying purposes and policies of the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act are:

(a) To simplify, clarify, and establish the law governing the rental of mobile home spaces and the rights and obligations of landlord and tenant; and

(b) To encourage landlord and tenant to maintain and improve the quality of mobile home living.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 2.